Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,338
Snowmobiles; political subdivisions; regulation; notice; restrictions.

(1) A county board may by resolution permit the operation of snowmobiles upon the roadway, shoulder, or inside bank or slope of any county highway if safe operation in the ditch or outside bank or slope thereof is impossible, in which case the county board shall cause appropriate notice thereof to be given.

(2) Any county, city, or village may regulate the operation of snowmobiles on public lands, waters, and property under its jurisdiction and on highways within its boundaries by resolution or ordinance of the governing body and by giving appropriate notice. Such resolutions or ordinances shall not be inconsistent with other provisions of law or with sections 60-6,320 to 60-6,346 and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and no such governmental unit may adopt an ordinance which (a) imposes a fee for the use of public land or water under the jurisdiction of either the state or any agency of the state or for the use of any access thereto owned by the state, a county, a city, or a village or (b) requires a snowmobile operator to possess an operator's license while operating a snowmobile.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 16;

Laws 1977, LB 230, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2016;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 434.